Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2659.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XII-DADVANCED TEACHING ROLES AND EVIDENCE-BASEDSTRATEGIC STAFFING PROGRAMSection 1201-D. Scope of article.This article relates to the Advanced Teaching Roles and Evidence-based Strategic Staffing Program.Section 1202-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article 1234567891011121314151617181920 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Classroom teacher." A teacher who works in a classroom providing instruction for at least 30% of the instructional day and is not classified as instructional support personnel."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Empirical evidence." The term includes experimental or quasi-experimental studies or rigorous internal data analyses comparing participating classrooms or schools to comparable nonparticipating classrooms or schools."Employee organization." As the term "employe organization" is defined in section 301(3) of the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act."Evidence-based strategic staffing." A school staffing model that:(1) Is supported by empirical evidence demonstrating improved student learning, growth and educator outcomes.(2) Includes the following criteria:(i) Teams of educators, including teachers, support staff such as paraprofessionals and tutors, student teachers, teacher apprentices or residents, that are collectively responsible for supporting groups of students, for planning and instruction and for the outcomes of their students.(ii) Differentiated roles and compensation, including team leader positions for teachers.(iii) Structure and time for educator collaboration and support.(iv) Flexibility in school staffing and scheduling 20260HB2659PN3670 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that provides teacher participation in the design of scheduling.(v) Integrated preparation pathways into the teaching profession."Program." The Advanced Teaching Roles and Evidence-based Strategic Staffing Program established under this article."Strategic scheduling." Protected time during the school day aligned with each role's instructional and leadership responsibilities, including time for collaboration, planning, data analysis and instructional coaching."Teacher-led team." A team of educators led by a teacher who is selected based on demonstrated prior high student growth and responsible for student outcomes across all students served by the team.Section 1203-D. Establishment of program.The Advanced Teaching Roles and Evidence-based Strategic Staffing Program is established within the department. The program shall award grants to participating school districts for the following purposes:(1) Expand the reach of highly effective classroom teachers by enabling them to:(i) serve additional students in an advanced teaching role;(ii) become a lead classroom teacher accountable for the student performance of all students taught by teachers on the lead classroom teacher's team; or(iii) lead a larger effort in the school to implement new instructional models to improve schoolwide performance.(2) Enable school districts to design and implement 20260HB2659PN3670 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 innovative compensation models that:(i) support classroom teacher professional growth;(ii) are tied to measurable improvements in student outcomes; and(iii) provide additional compensation for advanced teaching roles, provided that teachers selected for advanced teaching roles and any associated salary supplements are based on demonstrated effectiveness and the assumption of additional responsibilities.(3) Establish organizational changes related to compensation in order to support educators in implementing evidence-based teaching practices and to enable the practices to be replicated across this Commonwealth.(4) Permit school districts to align strategic staffing efforts with other Statewide education priorities, including structured literacy initiatives, curriculum implementation, instructional improvement efforts and career-connected learning.(5) Achieve savings through collective bargaining agreements under the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act.Section 1204-D. Request for proposals.(a) Duty of department to issue.--Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year and each school year thereafter, the department shall issue a request for proposals no later than September 15 for the program. A school district may submit a proposal by December 1 of each year. The request for proposals shall require that a proposal include, at a minimum, the following:(1) A description of the proposed program structure. The description must demonstrate alignment, as applicable, with 20260HB2659PN3670 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 evidence-based strategic staffing elements identified in this section, including teacher-led teams, advanced instructional roles, differentiated role-based compensation and strategic scheduling structures. The description shall include all of the following:(i) A plan for how the school district will utilize and train classroom teachers serving in advanced teaching roles and an explanation of the connection between the proposed responsibilities, professional learning supports and expected improvements in student outcomes.(ii) Evidence that the proposed strategic staffing model is supported by empirical research or internal data analysis demonstrating improved student learning growth and educator outcomes, including, where feasible, comparison to similar schools not implementing the model.(iii) An explanation of how the program will incorporate evidence-based school design features, including:(A) Advanced roles for teachers, including innovative roles within teams that extend the reach of excellent educators through advanced responsibilities and team-based instruction.(B) Teams led by educators supporting students across core academic subjects, including English language arts, mathematics, social studies, science and career-connected learning opportunities.(C) Scheduling structures that provide educators with significant protected time during the school day for collaboration, planning, data analysis and instructional leadership.20260HB2659PN3670 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A description of each proposed advanced teaching role, including minimum qualifications for the position, which shall include locally determined, competency-based measurements of highly effective teachers.(3) Job responsibilities that include at least one of the following:(i) Teaching an increased number of students and serving as the teacher of record, with accountability for those students' academic performance.(ii) Serving as a lead classroom teacher for a group of teachers and participating in Pennsylvania Value-Added Assessment System in accordance with a model developed by the department. The department shall publish and clearly describe the model on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(iii) Providing in-house professional development or coaching. The training must ensure that the professional development or coaching the teacher provides is faithfully implemented in the classroom. A teacher serving in the role may not conduct formal or informal evaluations of other teachers, contribute to performance ratings or participate in disciplinary actions related to teacher evaluation.(4) A description of how the school district will communicate to all employees and the public the criteria and selection process for the advanced teaching roles, the ongoing eligibility requirements for the advanced teaching roles and the evaluation process for individuals selected to serve in the advanced teaching roles.(5) An implementation plan, including:20260HB2659PN3670 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The number of schools within the school district that will implement advanced teaching roles and any new proposed compensation model.(ii) The number of advanced teaching roles at each participating school.(iii) The number of students whose teacher of record will serve in an advanced teaching role.(iv) The number of teachers overall eligible to participate in the proposed new compensation model.(v) A description of how the advanced teaching roles model will be implemented across all grade spans served by participating schools. Initial implementation may be phased, but the plan must include a timeline for availability across elementary, middle and high school levels, as applicable.(6) A plan for long-term financial sustainability following the expiration of any grant awarded to the school district. The plan must include a description of how the applicant intends to continue to provide supplemental compensation for teachers serving in advanced teaching roles without reliance on grant funding.(7) A description of how the school district or consortium of school districts will partner with local educator preparation programs, institutions of higher education or community colleges to strengthen teacher effectiveness and improve student outcomes.(8) A memorandum of understanding executed by the school district superintendent or chief executive, the president of the local board of education and the employee organization, where applicable, affirming:20260HB2659PN3670 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Agreement to implement the proposed advanced teaching roles model.(ii) Commitment to work together on any necessary adjustments to current contracts or agreements.(iii) Commitment to financial sustainability beyond the grant term.(9) A commitment that, prior to the plan under paragraph (5) being finalized and submitted, a notice will be shared with local union leaders.(b) Selection of proposals.--(1) By March 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the department shall review proposals and select school districts to participate in the program, beginning in the subsequent school year, in accordance with minimum criteria established by the department consistent with this section. The department shall develop the guidelines, the application and criteria for final selection of applicants by considering the guidance and consultation with stakeholders.(2) The department shall review and approve proposals in accordance with criteria established by regulation.(3) The department shall give priority to school systems serving high percentages of students from low-income backgrounds, rural communities or systems with high teacher vacancy rates.(c) Material revisions of plans.--(1) Material revisions of a plan submitted to the department shall require approval by the department.(2) Prior to submission of any material revision, the school district shall consult with and, where required by law, bargain in good faith with the exclusive representative 20260HB2659PN3670 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of their employees regarding any proposed changes affecting compensation, evaluation, working conditions, class size or scheduling. Documentation of such consultation or bargaining shall be submitted with the revision request.(d) Reporting requirements for grantees.--A school district or consortium of school districts selected by the department for participation in the program shall begin implementation of its approved plan starting with the 2027-2028 school year or the first full school year following approval for any subsequent cohort. Beginning in the second year of implementation and annually thereafter, each participating school district shall submit to the department a report demonstrating compliance with the participating school district's approved plan. The report shall include, at a minimum:(1) The number of teachers serving in advanced teaching roles in the school district and the number of students receiving instruction from those teachers.(2) Student growth measures, including outcomes on State assessments and locally adopted measures.(3) Educator retention trends across participating schools, disaggregated to compare teachers serving on teams established under this legislation with those not participating on such teams.(4) Evidence of implementation fidelity to the approved staffing model.(5) Qualitative and quantitative indicators of instructional improvement, using multiple measures.(e) Prohibition.--(1) An individual teacher's selection for an advanced teaching role, continued participation in an advanced 20260HB2659PN3670 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 teaching role or compensation may not be determined solely on the basis of a single performance measure.(2) Participation in the program does not constitute a merit pay system.(3) Compensation provided under this section shall recognize additional professional responsibilities, leadership duties and expanded instructional roles and may not be based solely on individual student standardized testing outcomes.(f) Grant term and eligibility for renewal.--(1) A program grant may not exceed three years. A school district is not eligible to receive a grant beyond the initial term, except that a school district with more than 20 schools may apply for a one-time renewal to continue scaling the advanced teaching roles model within the school district.(2) A renewal shall be subject to review and approval by the department based on the school district's progress in implementing the model and adherence to reporting requirements.(g) Amount of grant and use of State funds.--(1) A participating school district shall receive:(i) a base planning and implementation grant of not less than $150,000 and not more than $200,000, determined by the department, based on the school district's total student enrollment and proposed scope of implementation; and(ii) an additional per-school implementation amount determined by formula, based on the number of participating schools approved in the implementation plan.20260HB2659PN3670 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The grant money shall be used for any of the following purposes:(i) Development of advanced teaching roles plans.(ii) Development of professional development courses for teachers in advanced teaching roles that lead to improved student outcomes.(iii) Transition costs associated with designing and implementing advanced teaching models. Transition costs may include employing staff members or contractors to assist with design and implementation of the plan.(iv) Development of the design and implementation of compensation plans that focus on teacher professional growth and student outcomes and the transition costs associated with designing and implementing new compensation plans, including employing staff members or contractors to assist with design and implementation of the plan.(v) Support implementation of approved advanced teaching roles plans. Planning activities may be funded only as part of a comprehensive implementation plan that includes launch of advanced teaching roles no later than the beginning of the second school year following award.(h) Program evaluation.--(1) The department shall evaluate how the advanced teaching roles and new compensation plans have accomplished, at a minimum, the following:(i) Improvement in the quality of classroom instruction and increases in schoolwide growth or the growth of teachers who are mentored or impacted by a teacher in an advanced teaching role.20260HB2659PN3670 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) An increase in the attractiveness of teaching.(iii) Recognition, impact and retention of high-quality classroom teachers.(iv) Assistance to and retention of beginning classroom teachers on teaching teams.(v) Improvement in school culture based on school climate survey results.(2) The department shall commission a comprehensive third-party evaluation every three years assessing longitudinal student outcomes, educator career progression and retention, fiscal sustainability and fidelity of implementation. For each evaluation cycle, the sum of $100,000 shall be allocated for the purpose of conducting the evaluation required under this subsection.(3) The department shall provide any report required in accordance with this subsection to the offices of the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the Education Committee of the Senate and the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2659PN3670 - 12 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122